District of Columbia statutes.
22-3809

Parole; discharge.

Any person committed under this chapter may be released from confinement when an appropriate supervisory official finds that he or she has sufficiently recovered so as to not be dangerous to other persons, provided if the person to be released be one charged with crime or undergoing sentence therefor, that official shall give notice thereof to the judge of the criminal court and deliver him or her to the court in obedience to proper precept.

History

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 349, ch. 428, title II, § 207
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(t)(2)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(g), 41 DCR 1639

Cross References

Sex offenders, persons required to register, see § 24-4102.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3808 and § 22-3810.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3509.
1973 Ed., § 22-3509.